Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 2. Standard Valuation Law Policies and Contracts
§ 26-6-212.
Confidential information; when disclosure is permitted.

Privilege for, and confidentiality of, confidential information is as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer’s confidential information is confidential and privileged and shall not be subject to public inspection, subpoena, discovery or be admissible in evidence in any private civil action. The commissioner may use an insurer’s confidential information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought against the insurer as part of the commissioner’s official duties;

Neither the commissioner nor any person who receives confidential information while acting under the authority of the commissioner shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning an insurer’s confidential information;

In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s duties, and provided that a recipient agrees, and has the legal authority to agree to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of documents, materials, data and other information in the same manner and to the same extent as required for the commissioner, the commissioner may share confidential information with other state, federal and international regulatory agencies or law enforcement officials, with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries and, in the case of confidential information specified in paragraphs (c)(i) and (iv) of this section only, with the actuarial board for counseling and discipline or its successor upon request stating that the confidential information is required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings and with state, federal and international law enforcement officials;

The commissioner may receive documents, materials, data and other information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, data or information, from the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, regulatory or law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions and the actuarial board for counseling and discipline or its successor. The commissioner shall maintain as confidential or privileged any document, material, data or other information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material or other information;

The commissioner may enter into agreements governing the sharing and use of information consistent with the provisions of this subsection;

No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the confidential information shall occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized under paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

A privilege established under the law of any state or jurisdiction that is substantially similar to the privilege established under this subsection shall be available and enforced in any proceeding of this state;

As used in this section “regulatory agency,” “law enforcement agency” and the “NAIC” include their employees, agents, consultants and contractors.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any confidential information specified in paragraphs (c)(i) and (iv) of this section:

May be subject to subpoena for the purpose of defending an action seeking damages from the appointed actuary submitting the related memorandum in support of an opinion submitted under W.S.

26-6-208

or principle based valuation report developed under W.S. 26-6-210(b)(iii) by reason of an action required by this article or by rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with this article;

May otherwise be released by the commissioner with the written consent of the insurer the confidential information relates to; and

Once any portion of a memorandum in support of an opinion submitted under W.S.

26-6-208

or a principle based valuation report developed under W.S. 26-6-210(b)(iii) is cited by the insurer in its marketing or is publicly volunteered to or before a governmental agency other than a state insurance department or is released by the insurer to the news media, all portions of the memorandum or report shall no longer be privileged or confidential.

For purposes of this section, “confidential information” means:

A memorandum in support of an opinion submitted under W.S.

26-6-208

and any other documents, materials and other information including all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the memorandum;

Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, all documents, materials, digital or electronic documents and other information including all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in the course of an examination made under W.S. 26-6-209(f). If an examination report or other material prepared in connection with an examination made under W.S.

26-2-116

is not held as private and confidential information under W.S.

26-2-116

, an examination report or other material prepared in connection with an examination made under W.S. 26-6-209(f) shall not be confidential information to the same extent as if the examination report or other material had been prepared under W.S. 26-2-116;

Any reports, documents, materials and other information developed by an insurer in support of, or in connection with, an annual certification by the insurer under W.S. 26-6-210(b)(ii) and any reports, documents, materials, digital or electronic documents and other information including all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the reports, documents, materials and other information;

Any principle based valuation report developed under W.S. 26-6-210(b)(iii) and any other documents, materials, digital or electronic documents and other information including all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the report; and

Any experience data submitted by an insurer under W.S.

26-6-211

and any reports, documents, materials, data, digital or electronic documents and other information including all working papers, and copies thereof, created or produced in connection with the experience data that include any potentially insurer identifying or personally identifiable information, that is provided to or obtained by the commissioner. This includes any reports, documents, materials, data, digital or electronic documents and other information including all working papers, and copies thereof, created, produced or obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any other person in connection with the experience data or any other report, document, material, datum, digital or electronic documents or other information referred to in this paragraph.

History.

2017 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

§ 26-6-213.
Single state exemption.

The commissioner may exempt specific product forms or product lines of a domestic insurer that is licensed and doing business only in Wyoming from the requirements of W.S.

26-6-209

, provided that:

The commissioner has issued an exemption in writing to the insurer and has not subsequently revoked the exemption in writing; and

The insurer computes reserves using assumptions and methods used prior to the operative date of the valuation manual in addition to any requirements established by rule and regulation of the commissioner.

For any insurer granted an exemption under this section, W.S.

26-6-203

and

26-6-205

through

26-6-208

shall be applicable. With respect to any insurer applying the exemption granted under this section, any reference to W.S.

26-6-209

found in W.S.

26-6-203

and

26-6-205

through

26-6-208

shall not be applicable.

History.

2017 ch. 67, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 67, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.